Alaska, session 34, HB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 06 to read: 07 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The Alaska State Legislature finds that it is in the public 08 interest to establish a new administrative area on the east side of Cook Inlet. 09 * Sec. 2. AS 16.05.050(a) is amended to read: 10 (a) The commissioner has, but not by way of limitation, the following powers 11 and duties: 12 (1) through the appropriate state agency and under the provisions of 13 AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code), to acquire by gift, purchase, or lease, or other 14 lawful means, land, buildings, water, rights-of-way, or other necessary or proper real 01 or personal property when the acquisition is in the interest of furthering an objective or 02 purpose of the department and the state; 03 (2) under the provisions of AS 36.30, to design and construct 04 hatcheries, pipelines, rearing ponds, fishways, and other projects beneficial for the fish 05 and game resources of the state; 06 (3) to accept money from any person under conditions requiring the 07 use of the money for specific purposes in the furtherance of the protection, 08 rehabilitation, propagation, preservation, or investigation of the fish and game 09 resources of the state or in settlement of claims for damages to fish or game resources; 10 (4) to collect, classify, and disseminate statistics, data and information 11 that, in the commissioner's discretion, will tend to promote the purposes of this title 12 except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52; 13 (5) to take, capture, propagate, transport, buy, sell, or exchange fish or 14 game or eggs for propagating, scientific, public safety, or stocking purposes; 15 (6) under the provisions of AS 36.30, to provide public facilities where 16 necessary or proper to facilitate the taking of fish or game, and to enter into 17 cooperative agreements with any person to effect them; 18 (7) to exercise administrative, budgeting, and fiscal powers; 19 (8) under the provisions of AS 36.30, to construct, operate, supervise, 20 and maintain vessels used by the department; 21 (9) to authorize the holder of an interim-use permit under AS 16.43 to 22 engage on an experimental basis in commercial taking of a fishery resource with 23 vessel, gear, and techniques not presently qualifying for licensing under this chapter in 24 conformity with standards established by the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry 25 Commission; 26 (10) not later than January 31 of each year, to provide to the 27 commissioner of revenue the names of those fish and shellfish species that the 28 commissioner of fish and game designates as developing commercial fish species for 29 that calendar year; a fish or shellfish species is a developing commercial fish species 30 if, within a specified geographical region, 31 (A) the optimum yield from the harvest of the species has not 01 been reached; 02 (B) a substantial portion of the allowable harvest of the species 03 has been allocated to fishing vessels of a foreign nation; or 04 (C) a commercial harvest of the fish species has recently 05 developed; 06 (11) to initiate or conduct research necessary or advisable to carry out 07 the purposes of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52; 08 (12) to enter into cooperative agreements with agencies of the federal 09 government, educational institutions, or other agencies or organizations, when in the 10 public interest, to carry out the purposes of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52; 11 (13) to implement an on-board observer program authorized by the 12 Board of Fisheries under AS 16.05.251(a)(13); implementation 13 (A) must be as unintrusive to vessel operations as practicable; 14 and 15 (B) must make scheduling and scope of observers' activities as 16 predictable as practicable; 17 (14) to sell fish caught during commercial fisheries test fishing 18 operations; 19 (15) to establish and charge fees equal to the cost of services provided 20 by the department, including provision of public shooting ranges, broodstock and eggs 21 for private nonprofit hatcheries, department publications, and other direct services, and 22 reasonable fees for the use of state facilities managed by the department; fees 23 established under this paragraph for tours of hatchery facilities, commercial use of 24 sport fishing access sites, and for operation of state hatchery facilities by private 25 aquaculture associations are not subject to the cost limit under AS 37.10.050(a); 26 (16) to permit and regulate aquatic farming in the state in a manner 27 that ensures the protection of the state's fish and game resources and improves the 28 economy, health, and well-being of the citizens of the state; 29 (17) to operate state housing and facilities for employees, contractors, 30 and others in support of the department's responsibilities and to charge rent that is 31 consistent with applicable collective bargaining agreements, or, if no collective 01 bargaining agreement is applicable, competitive with market conditions; rent received 02 from tenants shall be deposited in the general fund; 03 (18) to petition the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission, 04 unless the Board of Fisheries disapproves the petition under AS 16.05.251(g), to 05 establish a moratorium on new entrants into commercial fisheries 06 (A) that have experienced recent increases in fishing effort that 07 are beyond a low, sporadic level of effort; 08 (B) that have achieved a level of harvest that may be 09 approaching or exceeding the maximum sustainable level for the fishery; and 10 (C) for which there is insufficient biological and resource 11 management information necessary to promote the conservation and sustained 12 yield management of the fishery; 13 (19) to promote fishing, hunting, and trapping and preserve the 14 heritage of fishing, hunting, and trapping in the state; 15 (20) to require a vessel registered under AS 16.05.475 to 16 participate in an electronic monitoring program for a state commercial finfish 17 trawl fishery; however, before implementing an electronic monitoring program 18 in a finfish trawl fishery, the commissioner shall determine in writing that 19 (A) vessels active in the fishery already have electronic 20 monitoring systems onboard because the vessels also participate in a 21 federal fishery managed under 50 C.F.R. Part 679 in the Bering Sea, 22 Aleutian Islands, or the Gulf of Alaska that requires electronic 23 monitoring; 24 (B) implementation of an electronic monitoring program in 25 the fishery will not require a vessel owner to purchase or install electronic 26 monitoring equipment beyond what is already required for the vessel to 27 participate in the federally managed fishery; and 28 (C) electronic monitoring 29 (i) is a practical tool for data gathering or 30 enforcement in that fishery; 31 (ii) will not unduly disrupt the fishery; 01 (iii) can be conducted at a reasonable cost; and 02 (iv) can be coordinated with electronic monitoring 03 programs of the federal National Marine Fisheries Service and 04 other state and federal agencies. 05 * Sec. 3. AS 16.05.050 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (c) The commissioner may not levy an assessment or other charge on 07 participating commercial fishers to fund the costs of implementing or operating an 08 electronic monitoring program in a fishery under (a)(20) of this section. 09 * Sec. 4. AS 16.43.200 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 10 (c) Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, for the purposes of issuing 11 entry permits and controlling entry into the commercial set net fishery on the east side 12 of Cook Inlet, the commission shall establish the area administered on December 31, 13 2024, identified by the Department of Fish and Game as of January 1, 2024, as 14 statistical areas 244-21, 244-22, 244-31, 244-32, 244-41, and 244-42 of the Upper 15 Subdistrict of the Cook Inlet Central District as a distinct administrative area separate 16 from the Cook Inlet administrative area. 17 (d) An entry permit that entitled a person to set net commercially in the area 18 that was administered on December 31, 2024, by the commission as the Cook Inlet 19 administrative area does not entitle that person to set net commercially in the 20 administrative area established under (c) of this section unless the commission 21 reassigns the permit to that administrative area. 22 * Sec. 5. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 23 read: 24 TRANSITION: REGULATIONS. The Department of Fish and Game may adopt 25 regulations necessary to implement the changes made by secs. 2 and 3 of this Act. The 26 regulations take effect under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), but not before the 27 effective date of the law implemented by the regulation. 28 * Sec. 6. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 29 read: 30 TRANSITION: REASSIGNMENT OF CERTAIN COOK INLET AREA SET NET 31 ENTRY PERMITS. (a) On January 1, 2027, an individual holding an entry permit that entitles 01 the individual to commercially set net in the Cook Inlet administrative area may have the 02 individual's entry permit renewed as an entry permit for the Cook Inlet set net administrative 03 area under AS 16.43.150(c), consistent with the boundaries of that administrative area 04 established under AS 16.43.200, as amended by sec. 4 of this Act, unless the individual 05 provides proof satisfactory to the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission of the 06 individual's participation or, if the individual acquired the individual's entry permit from an 07 immediate family member, of the immediate family member's participation in the fishery in 08 the areas identified by the Department of Fish and Game as of January 1, 2024, as statistical 09 areas 244-21, 244-22, 244-31, 244-32, 244-41, and 244-42 of the Upper Subdistrict of the 10 Cook Inlet Central District within the five years preceding December 31, 2024. Proof 11 satisfactory of participation under this subsection may include a shore fisheries lease, an area 12 registration, a buoy tag, or previous submission of fishing statistics for the area. 13 (b) An individual who provides proof satisfactory to the Alaska Commercial Fisheries 14 Entry Commission of the individual's participation in the fishery in the areas identified by the 15 Department of Fish and Game as of January 1, 2024, as statistical areas 244-21, 244-22, 244- 16 31, 244-32, 244-41, and 244-42 of the Upper Subdistrict of the Cook Inlet Central District 17 under (a) of this section shall be reassigned an entry permit on January 1, 2027, for the new 18 administrative area established under AS 16.43.200(c), enacted by sec. 4 of this Act. 19 (c) In this section, "immediate family member" means 20 (1) the spouse of an individual; 21 (2) another individual cohabiting with an individual in a conjugal relationship 22 that is not a legal marriage; 23 (3) a child, including a stepchild or an adopted child, of an individual; 24 (4) a parent, sibling, grandparent, aunt, or uncle of an individual; and 25 (5) a parent or sibling of an individual's spouse. 26 * Sec. 7. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 27 read: 28 TRANSITION: APPEAL OF COMMISSION DECISION NOT TO ASSIGN AN 29 APPLICANT'S PERMIT TO NEW ADMINISTRATIVE AREA. (a) An individual may 30 appeal a decision by the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission to renew the entry 31 permit held by the individual that allows the individual to commercially fish in the Cook Inlet 01 administrative area, as the area's boundaries are amended by AS 16.43.200(c), enacted by sec. 02 4 of this Act, instead of issuing the individual an entry permit for the administrative area 03 established by AS 16.43.200(c), enacted by sec. 4 of this Act. An appeal under this section 04 must be made to the superior court on or before March 1, 2027. 05 (b) The commission shall provide an individual who is appealing a decision of the 06 commission under this section a provisional entry permit for the administrative area 07 established by AS 16.43.200(c), enacted by sec. 4 of this Act. 08 * Sec. 8. Section 5 of this Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 09 * Sec. 9. Except as provided in sec. 8 of this Act, this Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.